Utah statutes.
39-6-91.   Waste or destruction of nonmilitary property.

A person subject to this chapter who while in a duty status willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and unlawfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a military court directs.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

